Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Safety

§ 77-9-221.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6680, 6681; 1930, §§ 6110, 6111; 1942, §§ 7762, 7763; Laws, 1912, ch. 153; 1940, ch. 171]

§ 77-9-223.
Exception to requirement of headlights.

Section 77-9-221 shall not apply:

to tramroads, mill roads and roads engaged principally in lumber or logging transportation in connection with mills;

to railroad systems under thirty miles long which do not run regular night schedules;

to any engine, the lighting equipment of which shall have failed during a trip, provided that it be shown that the equipment was in efficient and effective working condition when the trip was begun; or

to switch engines going to and returning from wrecks, or sent out on a main line to bring into a terminal a train, the engine of which has become disabled.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6682; 1930, § 6112; 1942, § 7764; Laws, 1912, ch. 153.

§ 77-9-225.
Locomotives to give warning when approaching crossings; penalty.

Every railroad company shall cause each locomotive engine run by it to be provided with a bell of at least thirty (30) pounds weight and with a whistle or horn which can be heard distinctly at a distance of three hundred (300) yards, and shall cause the bell to be rung or the whistle or horn to be blown at the distance of at least three hundred (300) yards from the place where the railroad crosses over any public highway or municipal street. The bell shall be kept ringing continuously or the whistle or horn shall be kept blowing at repeated intervals until said crossing is passed.

Every person, company or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or be imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or be both so fined and imprisoned, in the discretion of the court.

The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 6125, 6126; 1942, §§ 7777, 7778; Laws, 1924, ch. 320; Laws, 1952, ch. 332; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-227.
Freight cars shall not be placed in rear of passenger cars; penalty.

In forming a passenger train, freight or merchandise or lumber cars shall not be placed in the rear of passenger cars. If they, or any of them, shall be so placed and any accident happens to life or limb, the officer or agent who so directed or knowingly suffered such arrangement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars. This section shall not apply where railroad trains are carrying personnel and equipment in connection with military or naval movements.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4044; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6668; 1930, § 6113; 1942, § 7765; Laws, 1942, ch. 273.

§ 77-9-229.
Backing into or along a passenger depot; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to back a train of cars, or part of a train, or an engine into or along a passenger depot at a greater rate of speed than three (3) miles an hour. Every such train, part of a train, or engine backing into or along a passenger depot, and within fifty (50) feet thereof, shall, for at least three hundred (300) feet before it reaches or comes opposite to such depot, be preceded by a servant of the railroad company on foot, not exceeding forty (40) nor under twenty (20) feet in advance, to give warning. For every injury inflicted by a railroad company while violating this section, the party injured may recover full damages without regard to mere contributory negligence.

A failure to observe this section shall cause a railroad company to be liable to a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 2423; 1880, § 1049; 1892, §§ 3549, 3551; 1906, §§ 4047, 4049; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6671, 6673; 1930, §§ 6119, 6128; 1942, §§ 7771, 7780.

§ 77-9-231.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 7695, 7697, 7698; 1930, §§ 6120, 6121; 1942, §§ 7772, 7773; Laws, 1908, ch. 95]

§ 77-9-233.
Exception to requirement of pilots and headlights.

Section 77-9-231 shall not apply:

to railroads whose principal business is hauling logs;

to locomotive engines running for coal or water, doubling hills, returning from trains when broken into, or going to or returning from trains in the yard limits of terminal stations;

to engines engaged in regular switching service in yards or road engines switching at intermediate stations; or

to any locomotive engines in cases of washouts, wrecks, or when going to the assistance of engines so disabled as to block the main track of a railroad.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7696; 1930, § 6122; 1942, § 7774; Laws, 1908, ch. 95.

§ 77-9-235.
Obstructing highways and streets; penalty.

Every railroad company, upon stopping any train at a place where such railroad shall cross a highway, shall so uncouple its cars as not to obstruct travel upon such highway for a longer period than five (5) minutes. Every railroad company shall, upon stopping a train at a place where the railroad is crossed by a street, so uncouple the cars as not to obstruct travel thereon for a longer period than shall be prescribed by ordinance of the city, town or village. A failure to observe this section shall cause a railroad company to be liable to a fine of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for each offense. The conductor in charge of any train so violating the provisions of this section shall be liable to a fine of not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00), on conviction thereof.

The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 2423; 1880, § 1049; 1892, § 3551; 1906, § 4049; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6673; 1930, § 6128; 1942, § 7780; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-236.
Obstructing highways and streets; criminal responsibility of crew complying with orders of employer.

No member of a train crew, yard crew or engine crew of a railroad which is a common carrier shall be held criminally responsible or found guilty of violating any state laws or of any municipal ordinances regulating or intended to regulate the blocking of any street, road or highway grade crossings by trains or passenger or freight cars upon reasonable proof that the blocking of said street, road or highway grade crossings was necessary to comply with the orders or instructions, either written or oral, of his employer or its officers or supervisory officials; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not relieve the employer or railroad from any responsibility placed upon said employee or railroad by any such state laws or by such municipal ordinances; and provided further, that the employer or railroad shall stand in the place of the member of the train crew, yard crew or engine crew in such circumstances and shall be responsible for the violation of any such state laws or municipal ordinances and any criminal fines resulting therefrom.

The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 314; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-237.
Speed limit in cities.

Any railroad company having the right of way may run locomotives and cars by steam through cities and towns, at the rate of thirty miles an hour and no more. The company shall be liable for any damages or injury which may be sustained by any one from such locomotive or cars whilst they are running at a greater speed than thirty miles an hour through any city or town. The public service commission shall have power to fix and prescribe limits in cities and towns in which railroad companies may run locomotives and cars by steam at a greater rate than thirty miles an hour, and whenever it shall have fixed and prescribed such limits in any city or town this section shall not thereafter apply to the running of cars and locomotives by steam within the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 36; 1871, § 2421; 1880, § 1074; 1892, § 3546; 1906, § 4043; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6667; 1930, § 6130; 1942, § 7782; Laws, 1896, p. 76; Laws, 1938, ch. 329.

§ 77-9-239.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

[Codes, 1892, § 4317; 1906, § 4871; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7656; 1930, § 7084; 1942, § 7860]

§§ 77-9-241 and 77-9-243.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§77-9-241. [Codes, 1892, § 3553; 1906, § 4051; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6675; 1930, § 6116; 1942, § 7768; Laws, 1916, ch. 228]

§77-9-243. [Codes, 1871, § 2423; 1880, § 1049; 1892, §§ 3548, 3551; 1906, §§ 4046, 4049; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6670, 6673; 1930, §§ 6118, 6128; 1942, §§ 7770, 7780; Laws, 1976, ch. 303]

§ 77-9-245.
Inclosures around depots.

A railroad company may erect an inclosure around a depot, where the public safety requires it, to prevent persons other than passengers from coming near the locomotive and cars, and may exclude from within such inclosure all persons except passengers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 40; 1871, § 2426; 1880, § 1052; 1892, § 3554; 1906, § 4052; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6676; 1930, § 6117; 1942, § 7769.

§ 77-9-247.
Railroads shall erect “railroad crossbuck.”

Every railroad corporation or company or person or persons operating or controlling any railroad track intersecting a public road or street at grade crossings shall erect and maintain at each such crossing the standard sign known as “railroad crossbuck,” the design of which has been standardized by the Association of American Railroads and which appears in the “Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices” for the State of Mississippi as adopted by the Commissioner of Public Safety, the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the United States Department of Transportation.

Provided, further, that said railroad crossbuck shall be reflectorized and be placed in the right side of the road or street on both sides of the railroad and shall indicate the number of tracks crossing the road or street in accordance with the aforesaid manual on uniform traffic control devices.

The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 6123, 6126; 1942, §§ 7775, 7778; Laws, 1924, ch. 320; Laws, 1974, ch. 525 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-248.
Installation of crossbuck as present signs are replaced.

The crossbuck signs provided for in Section 77-9-247 shall be installed by the corporation, company or persons controlling the railroad as the present signs are replaced.

The provisions of this section shall be enforced by the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 525, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-249.
Obedience to signal indicating approach of train; penalties.

Whenever any person driving a vehicle approaches a railroad grade crossing under any of the circumstances stated in this subsection, the driver of such vehicle shall stop within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest rail of such railroad, and shall not proceed until he can do so safely. The foregoing requirements shall apply when one or more of the following circumstances exists:

A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad train; or

A crossing gate is lowered or when a human flagman gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of a railroad train; or

A railroad train approaching within approximately nine hundred (900) feet of the highway crossing emits a signal in accordance with Section 77-9-225, and such railroad train, by reason of its speed or nearness to such crossing, is an immediate hazard; or

An approaching railroad train is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity to such crossing.

No person shall drive any vehicle through, around or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

In the trial of all actions to recover personal injury or property damages, sustained by any driver of such vehicles for collision of said vehicle and train in which action it may appear that the said driver may have violated any of the provisions hereof, the question of whether or not the said violation was the sole or approximate cause of the accident and injury shall be for the jury to determine. The violation of this section shall not of itself defeat recovery, and the question of negligence or the violation aforesaid shall be left to the jury; and the comparative negligence statutes and prima facie statute of this state shall apply in these cases as in other cases of negligence.

At any railroad grade crossing provided with visible railroad crossbuck signs without automatic electric or mechanical signal devices, crossing gates or a human flagman giving a signal of the approach or passage of a train, the driver of a vehicle shall, in obedience to such railroad crossbuck sign, yield the right-of-way and slow to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions, and shall stop if required for safety at a clearly marked stop line, or if no stop line, within fifty (50) feet, but not less than fifteen (15) feet, from the nearest rail of the railroad, and shall not proceed until he can do so safely.

Every person, company or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 6124, 6126; 1942, §§ 7776, 7778; Laws, 1924, ch. 320; Laws, 1974, ch. 525, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 448, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-9-250.
Operation Lifesaver Program; purpose; Operation Lifesaver Fund created; sources of funds.

There is created within the Department of Transportation the Operation Lifesaver Program.The purpose of the program is to increase safety of and prevent loss of life and property at railroad crossings by increasing compliance, on the part of the railroads and the public, with the provisions of Section 77-9-249.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Operation Lifesaver Fund.The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the Operation Lifesaver Program.Monies from the funds derived from assessments under Section 99-19-73 shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Mississippi Department of Transportation.The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:

Monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding Operation Lifesaver;

The interest accruing to the fund;

Monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73;

Monies received from the federal government;

Donations; and

Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by or allowable under law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 495, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 77-9-251.
Highway crossings and bridges.

Where a railroad is constructed so as to cross a highway, and it be necessary to raise or lower the highway, it shall be the duty of the railroad company to make proper and easy grades in the highway, so that the railroad may be conveniently crossed, and to keep such crossings in good order. It shall be the duty of the railroad company to erect and keep in order all bridges on any highway, at such points as bridges may be necessary to cross the railroad. Any company which shall fail to comply with these provisions within sixty (60) days from the filing of written notice by the board of supervisors of the county in which said crossing is located, served upon the agent of said railroad company located in said county by the sheriff, as other processes are served, shall forfeit the sum of the cost of construction of said bridge or crossing, to be recovered by action in the name of the county in which the bridge or crossing is situated, upon an itemized bill of cost of said work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 35, art. 42; 1871, § 2428; 1880, § 1053; 1892, § 3555; 1906, § 4053; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6677; 1930, § 6127; 1942, § 7779; Laws, 1926, ch. 235.

§ 77-9-252.
Railroad grade crossings; private entity to pay cost of installation under certain circumstances.

Any developer, corporation, individual or other private entity requesting or applying for a new public railroad grade crossing shall be responsible for all costs for installing appropriate warning devices, for installing appropriate crossing surfaces and approaches, for establishing appropriate crossing profiles and for obtaining easements to maintain sight distance as deemed necessary for such crossing by a diagnostic survey team comprised of the Mississippi Department of Transportation Rails Engineer, a representative from the Federal Highway Administration, a representative of the affected railroad company and a representative of the affected local governmental jurisdiction.

When an existing private railroad grade crossing maintained for or by a private party is requested to become a publicly maintained railroad grade crossing, or when an existing private railroad grade crossing maintained for or by a private party is permitted by that party to be used as a public railroad grade crossing, the private party shall be responsible for all costs for installing warning devices, for replacing or modifying crossing surfaces and approaches as appropriate, for establishing appropriate crossing profiles and for obtaining easements to maintain sight distances as deemed necessary by the diagnostic survey team described in subsection (1) of this section for safety of the traveling public at such crossing before opening such crossing to the public. As used in this section, the term “private railroad grade crossing” means any privately maintained road or street not under the jurisdiction of a public entity that crosses a railroad, and which is permitted by a private railroad company or by other agreement, deed or law to cross its railroad tracks and right-of-way.

Any developer, corporation, individual or other private entity requesting or applying for a new public railroad grade crossing or for conversion of an existing private railroad grade crossing to a public railroad grade crossing, at the time of the request or application, shall notify the local roadway authority and the Mississippi Department of Transportation of such request or application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 357, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 77-9-253.
Stock-gaps and cattle-guards; crossing for plantation roads; penalty.

It is the duty of every railroad company to construct and maintain all necessary or proper stock gaps and cattle guards where its track passes through enclosed land, and to make and maintain convenient and suitable crossings over its track for necessary plantation roads. However, the duty to make and maintain convenient and suitable crossings for necessary plantation roads shall not apply to property under common ownership that is contiguous to a public road which provides access to a reasonably convenient public railroad crossing. For the purposes of this section, a public railroad crossing is reasonably convenient if it is one (1) mile or less from the plantation road measured along the railroad track.

For any failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section, the railroad company shall be liable to pay Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), to be recovered by the person interested.

A person owning or having an interest as cropper or tenant in land in an enclosure as described in subsection (1) of this section shall have a right of action under this section whether the land of such person is entered or traversed by said track or not.

This section shall apply to all enclosed land, whether said land is or may be situated in a county or district where the stock law is or may be in force or not. The penalty provided for in subsection (2) of this section shall not be cumulative, and only one (1) recovery shall be had for each failure.

The provisions of this section may be enforced by a court of competent jurisdiction.

The provisions of this section shall not relieve a railroad company from the duty to continue to maintain convenient and suitable crossings over its track for necessary plantation roads and all necessary or proper stock gaps and cattle guards, if such crossings, stock gaps and cattle guards existed and were in use before July 1, 2002.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3561; 1906, § 4058; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6686; 1930, § 6129; 1942, § 7781; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 66; Laws, 2002, ch. 629, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 77-9-254.
Removal by railroad companies of vegetation at railroad right-of-way grade crossings; specifications; inspections by Department of Transportation; fines; damages.

At all public highway railroad grade crossings that do not have automatic flashing lights and/or gates where vegetation would materially obstruct the view of a vehicle operator exercising reasonable care of a train approaching a grade crossing from either direction, every railroad, as is reasonably practical, shall remove from its right-of-way which it owns or operates, such vegetation as weeds, brush, climbing vines, shrubbery and trees, for a distance of not less than three hundred (300) feet in each direction from the centerline of the public road or highway, unless the authorized train speed is ten (10) miles per hour or less, in which case the distance from the centerline of the public road or highway shall be not less than one hundred (100) feet. At the outer edges of the public road or highway, the vegetation shall be removed to a width of twenty-five (25) feet on each side of the centerline of the railroad or to the full width of the railroad’s operating right-of-way whichever is shorter. The area cleared of vegetation may be tapered inward from its full width at the involved roadway to the outer limits of the area being cleared so as to create a triangle, or it may be cleared at a constant width so as to form a rectangle.

The violation of subsection (1) of this section shall not of itself be grounds for recovery, and the comparative negligence statute and the apportionment statute of this state shall apply in these cases as in other cases of negligence.

This section does not change or modify the duties of the operator of a vehicle as set forth in Section 77-9-249, 63-3-1007, 63-3-1009, 63-3-1011 or 63-3-1013, or the application of such sections.

The Department of Transportation may periodically inspect and evaluate all public highway railroad grade crossings to determine whether such grade crossings are maintained in compliance with the provisions of this section. If the department determines that a particular grade crossing is not in compliance, the department shall notify the railroad company which owns or operates the right-of-way that a grade crossing is not in compliance with this section.

Every notification to a railroad company, as authorized under the provisions of this section shall be in writing transmitted by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the person listed as the registered agent of the railroad company for service of process. Upon receipt of the notice, the railroad company shall have thirty (30) days to comply with the notice before any civil action may be taken by the Department of Transportation.

Any railroad company that fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil fine of not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per violation. The Department of Transportation shall have the exclusive authority to bring a civil action to enforce the provisions of this section. The fines shall be payable to the Department of Transportation.

In any civil action to recover damages arising from or out of a highway railroad grade crossing accident, the failure of the Department of Transportation to inspect and evaluate a public highway railroad grade crossing and notify a railroad company of noncompliance, as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, shall not be considered as comparative negligence and shall not be discoverable or admissible as evidence in any civil trial.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 448, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-9-255.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, 1892, § 4314; 1906, § 4868; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7653; 1930, § 7081; 1942, § 7857]

§ 77-9-257.
Inspection of railroads.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall have every railroad inspected whenever it shall deem the same necessary, but at least once in each year. The results must be entered upon the minutes of the commission and embraced in its reports, and must embrace information as to the condition of the roadbed, rolling stock and depots, and such other facilities and equipment as the commission may deem proper. Whenever the commission shall find any roadbed, tunnel, switch or any part of a railroad track, or any rolling stock in actual use, in an unsafe condition, it shall direct the railroad company to make the necessary repairs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4316; 1906, § 4870; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7655; 1930, § 7083; 1942, § 7859; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-9-259.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, 1892, § 4315; 1906, § 4869; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7654; 1930, § 7082; 1942, § 7858]

§ 77-9-261.
Failure to submit to inspection; penalties.

If any officer or other employee of a railroad company shall fail to submit to the inspection of its engines or cars, or any trestle, bridge, roadbed, tracks, or any other equipment or facility owned or used by said railroad company, then such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or by confinement in the county jail for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and jail sentence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7806-06; Laws, 1970, ch. 429, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1970).

§ 77-9-263.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

[Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 7699, 7700; 1930, § 7085; 1942, § 7861; Laws, 1912, ch. 152]

§§ 77-9-265 and 77-9-267.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 460, § 14-15, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§77-9-265. [Codes, 1906, § 4897; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7681; 1930, § 7086; 1942, § 7862; Laws, 1908, ch. 91]

§77-9-267. [Codes, 1906, § 4896; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7680; 1930, § 7088; 1942, § 7864; Laws, 1896, p. 75; 1908, ch. 90]